Illinois, session 104th, HB4134.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-168 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-168)7    Sec. 15-168. Homestead exemption for persons with 8disabilities.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption is granted to persons with disabilities. The amount 11of the exemption shall in the amount of $2,000, except as 12provided in subsection (c), to be deducted from the property's 13value as equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue. 14The person with a disability shall receive the homestead 15exemption upon meeting the following requirements:16        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 17    residence by the person with a disability.18        (2) The person with a disability must be liable for 19    paying the real estate taxes on the property.20        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 21    record of the property or have a legal or equitable 22    interest in the property as evidenced by a written 23    instrument. In the case of a leasehold interest in   HB4134- 2 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1    property, the lease must be for a single family residence.2    A person who has a disability during the taxable year is 3eligible to apply for this homestead exemption during that 4taxable year. Application must be made during the application 5period in effect for the county of residence. If a homestead 6exemption has been granted under this Section and the person 7awarded the exemption subsequently becomes a resident of a 8facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 9Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 10ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, then the exemption 11shall continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be 12occupied by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the 13residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person 14qualified for the homestead exemption.15    (a-5) Except as provided in subsection (c): 16        (1) through taxable year 2025, the amount of the 17    homestead exemption for persons with disabilities under 18    this Section shall be $2,000; and 19        (2) for taxable year 2026 and thereafter, if the 20    applicant was the owner of the property in the year 21    immediately preceding the base year, then the amount of 22    the homestead exemption for persons with disabilities 23    under this Section shall be the greater of (i) $2,000 or 24    (ii) an amount that, when deducted from the property's 25    value as equalized or assessed by the Department of 26    Revenue, will cause the total aggregate property tax   HB4134- 3 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1    liability for the property for the taxable year for which 2    the exemption is claimed to equal the property tax 3    liability for the property for the year immediately 4    preceding the base year; and5        (3) for taxable year 2026 and thereafter, if the 6    applicant was not the owner of the property in the year 7    immediately preceding the base year, then:8            (A) for the base year, the amount of the homestead 9        exemption for persons with disabilities under this 10        Section shall be $2,000; and 11            (B) after the base year, the amount of the 12        homestead exemption for persons with disabilities 13        under this Section shall be the greater of (i) $2,000 14        or (ii) an amount that, when deducted from the 15        property's value as equalized or assessed by the 16        Department of Revenue, will cause the total aggregate 17        property tax liability for the property for the 18        taxable year for which the exemption is claimed to 19        equal the property tax liability for the property for 20        the base year. 21    (b) As used in For the purposes of this Section: ,22    "Base year" means the later of (i) the 2026 taxable year or 23(ii) the taxable year for which the person with a disability 24first qualifies and applies for the exemption under this 25Section for the subject property. 26    "Person "person with a disability" means a person unable   HB4134- 4 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of a 2medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can 3be expected to result in death or has lasted or can be expected 4to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. 5Persons with disabilities filing claims under this Act shall 6submit proof of disability in such form and manner as the 7Department shall by rule and regulation prescribe. Proof that 8a claimant is eligible to receive disability benefits under 9the Federal Social Security Act shall constitute proof of 10disability for purposes of this Act. Issuance of an Illinois 11Person with a Disability Identification Card stating that the 12claimant is under a Class 2 disability, as defined in Section 134A of the Illinois Identification Card Act, shall constitute 14proof that the person named thereon is a person with a 15disability for purposes of this Act. A person with a 16disability not covered under the Federal Social Security Act 17and not presenting an Illinois Person with a Disability 18Identification Card stating that the claimant is under a Class 192 disability shall be examined by a physician, optometrist (if 20the person qualifies because of a visual disability), advanced 21practice registered nurse, or physician assistant designated 22by the Department, and his status as a person with a disability 23determined using the same standards as used by the Social 24Security Administration. The costs of any required examination 25shall be borne by the claimant.26    (c) For taxable years before taxable year 2026, for For   HB4134- 5 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1land improved with (i) an apartment building owned and 2operated as a cooperative or (ii) a life care facility as 3defined under Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities Act that is 4considered to be a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 5value of the property, as equalized or assessed by the 6Department, shall be multiplied by the number of apartments or 7units occupied by a person with a disability. 8    For taxable year 2026 and thereafter, for land improved 9with an apartment building owned and operated as a cooperative 10or a building that is a life care facility that qualifies as a 11cooperative, the maximum reduction from the equalized assessed 12value of the property is limited to the sum of the reductions 13calculated for each unit occupied as a residence by a person 14with a disability. 15    The person with a disability shall receive the homestead 16exemption upon meeting the following requirements:17        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 18    residence by the person with a disability.19        (2) The person with a disability must be liable by 20    contract with the owner or owners of record for paying the 21    apportioned property taxes on the property of the 22    cooperative or life care facility. In the case of a life 23    care facility, the person with a disability must be liable 24    for paying the apportioned property taxes under a life 25    care contract as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 26    Facilities Act.  HB4134- 6 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 2    record of a legal or equitable interest in the cooperative 3    apartment building. A leasehold interest does not meet 4    this requirement. 5If a homestead exemption is granted under this subsection, the 6cooperative association or management firm shall credit the 7savings resulting from the exemption to the apportioned tax 8liability of the qualifying person with a disability. The 9chief county assessment officer may request reasonable proof 10that the association or firm has properly credited the 11exemption. 12    A person who willfully refuses to credit an exemption to 13the qualified person with a disability is guilty of a Class B 14misdemeanor. 15    (d) The chief county assessment officer shall determine 16the eligibility of property to receive the homestead exemption 17according to guidelines established by the Department. After a 18person has received an exemption under this Section, an annual 19verification of eligibility for the exemption shall be mailed 20to the taxpayer.21    In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 22chief county assessment officer shall provide to each person 23granted a homestead exemption under this Section a form to 24designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 25notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 26levied under this Code on the person's qualifying property.   HB4134- 7 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1The duplicate notice shall be in addition to the notice 2required to be provided to the person receiving the exemption 3and shall be given in the manner required by this Code. The 4person filing the request for the duplicate notice shall pay 5an administrative fee of $5 to the chief county assessment 6officer. The assessment officer shall then file the executed 7designation with the county collector, who shall issue the 8duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 9designation may be rescinded by the person with a disability 10in the manner required by the chief county assessment officer.11    (d-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 12chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 13the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 14that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 15year, provided that: 16        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 17    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 18    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 19        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 20    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 21    as of January 1, 2019; 22        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 23    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 24    this Code; and 25        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 26    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020   HB4134- 8 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1    taxable years. 2    (d-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 3chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 4the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 5that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 6year, if:7        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 8    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 9    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;10        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 11    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 12    as of January 1, 2020;13        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 14    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 15    this Code; and16        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 17    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 18    taxable years. 19    (d-15) For taxable years 2022 through 2027, in any county 20of more than 3,000,000 residents, and in any other county 21where the county board has authorized such action by ordinance 22or resolution, a chief county assessment officer may renew 23this exemption for any person who applied for the exemption 24and presented proof of eligibility, as described in subsection 25(b), without an annual application as required under 26subsection (d). A chief county assessment officer shall not   HB4134- 9 -LRB104 14478 HLH 27617 b1automatically renew an exemption under this subsection if: the 2physician, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, or 3physician assistant who examined the claimant determined that 4the disability is not expected to continue for 12 months or 5more; the exemption has been deemed erroneous since the last 6application; or the claimant has reported their ineligibility 7to receive the exemption. A chief county assessment officer 8who automatically renews an exemption under this subsection 9shall notify a person of a subsequent determination not to 10automatically renew that person's exemption and shall provide 11that person with an application to renew the exemption. 12    (e) A taxpayer who claims an exemption under Section 1315-165 or 15-169 may not claim an exemption under this 14Section. 15(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 16103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.